Utah statutes.
11-1-4.   Sinking fund -- Investment.

The legislative body of any county, municipality, school district, or taxing unit of Utah shall invest any sinking fund created by authority of law by following the procedures and requirements of Title 51, Chapter 7, State Money Management Act.



Amended by Chapter 285, 1992 General Session

